Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5126XC (3) 91 je/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 96.4, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 1 by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Permitted weekly work search activities 3 for purposes of this subsection shall include the following: 4 (1) For an individual with an intellectual disability, 5 autism spectrum disorder, or traumatic brain injury, 6 participation in a program offered or approved by the division 7 of vocational rehabilitation services established in the 8 department that is designed to provide rehabilitative support 9 to such individuals. 10 (2) For an individual who is blind, participation in 11 a program offered by the department for the blind that is 12 designed to assist such individuals in gaining or maintaining 13 employment. 14